Final source/morphy/foma/postpositions.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL +LOC +UN
LEXICON Root
PostpositionsStem;

LEXICON PostpositionsStem
	
	
බව	Postpositions;
සඳහා	Postpositions;
ලෙස	Postpositions;
ගැන	Postpositions;
විසින්	Postpositions;
තුළ	Postpositions;
වශයෙන්	Postpositions;
පිළිබඳ	Postpositions;
අනුව	Postpositions;
පසු	Postpositions;
මෙන්	Postpositions;
සිට	Postpositions;
වැනි	Postpositions;
බවට	Postpositions;
මත	Postpositions;
සේ	Postpositions;
පෙර	Postpositions;
වෙත	Postpositions;
මගින්	Postpositions;
දක්වා	Postpositions;
පිණිස	Postpositions;
පටන්	Postpositions;
ඇතුළු	Postpositions;
වගේ	Postpositions;
පරිදි	Postpositions;
පසුව	Postpositions;
යටතේ	Postpositions;
වෙනුවෙන්	Postpositions;
පහළ	Postpositions;
හැර	Postpositions;
පිට	Postpositions;
ඉහළ	Postpositions;
තුළින්	Postpositions;
සම්බන්ධයෙන්	Postpositions;
පුරා	Postpositions;
හෙවත්	Postpositions;
ඉහත	Postpositions;
කරා	Postpositions;
හෙයින්	Postpositions;
හට	Postpositions;
ඉදිරියට	Postpositions;
වෙනුවට	Postpositions;
හැටියට	Postpositions;
යට	Postpositions;
මඟින්	Postpositions;
ළඟ	Postpositions;
හරහා	Postpositions;
අසල	Postpositions;
බැහැර	Postpositions;
උඩ	Postpositions;
කල්හි	Postpositions;
අතරින්	Postpositions;
ඔස්සේ	Postpositions;
උදෙසා	Postpositions;
මිස	Postpositions;
වටා	Postpositions;
ඉදිරියේ	Postpositions;
අවට	Postpositions;
ඈත	Postpositions;
තුළට	Postpositions;
බඳු	Postpositions;
ළඟට	Postpositions;
වෙතට	Postpositions;
තිස්සේ	Postpositions;
පිටත	Postpositions;
සම්බන්ධව	Postpositions;
මෙනි	Postpositions;
දිගේ	Postpositions;
එමගින්	Postpositions;
දිගට	Postpositions;
ලෙසට	Postpositions;
අතුරින්	Postpositions;
වස්	Postpositions;
වෙතින්	Postpositions;
ඉවත	Postpositions;
ඉහළින්	Postpositions;
එහා	Postpositions;
පහළට	Postpositions;
වාගේ	Postpositions;
යටින්	Postpositions;
වන්	Postpositions;
පිටතට	Postpositions;
අතරට	Postpositions;
පිටින්	Postpositions;
අරබයා	Postpositions;
ඉහළට	Postpositions;
උඩට	Postpositions;
ආශ්‍රිතව	Postpositions;
අතරේ	Postpositions;
ඇතුළට	Postpositions;
දෙපස	Postpositions;
පුරාම	Postpositions;
ඉදිරිපිට	Postpositions;
අතුරෙන්	Postpositions;
පිටුපස	Postpositions;
ඉදිරියෙන්	Postpositions;
මැදින්	Postpositions;
විනා	Postpositions;
පෙරට	Postpositions;
පසුපස	Postpositions;
වටේ	Postpositions;
පරිද්දෙන්	Postpositions;
අතරතුර	Postpositions;
අසලට	Postpositions;
මතට	Postpositions;
එහාට	Postpositions;
ඇතුළුව	Postpositions;
කෙළින්ම	Postpositions;
අසලින්	Postpositions;
ළඟින්	Postpositions;
ඉඳන්	Postpositions;
හින්ද	Postpositions;
මිසක්	Postpositions;
මගිනි	Postpositions;
ඉස්සරහ	Postpositions;
මතින්	Postpositions;
ඉදිරිපස	Postpositions;
අබියස	Postpositions;
අරභයා	Postpositions;
ඔබ්බට	Postpositions;
යාබද	Postpositions;
යටතට	Postpositions;
ඇතුළේ	Postpositions;
පසෙකින්	Postpositions;
පහතට	Postpositions;
වනතුරු	Postpositions;
සමගින්	Postpositions;
මුලට	Postpositions;
අද්දර	Postpositions;
ඔබ්බෙන්	Postpositions;
අතරමග	Postpositions;
යාබදව	Postpositions;
අසබඩ	Postpositions;
අතරමඟ	Postpositions;
ඔබ්බෙහි	Postpositions;
සමඟින්	Postpositions;
පහතින්	Postpositions;
ඇතුළෙන්	Postpositions;
අද්දරට	Postpositions;
අබියසට	Postpositions;
අද්දරින්	Postpositions;
අබියසින්	Postpositions;
අබියෙස	Postpositions;
	





LEXICON Postpositions

+N+RT: #;
